SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0419 Y 30
SFX 0419 a ach .
SFX 0419 a achmoj .
SFX 0419 a achmy .
SFX 0419 a achu .
SFX 0419 a aty .
SFX 0419 a ał .
SFX 0419 a ała .
SFX 0419 a ałe .
SFX 0419 a ało .
SFX 0419 a ałoj .
SFX 0419 a eli .
SFX 0419 a eć .
SFX 0419 a eće .
SFX 0419 a eštaj .
SFX 0419 a eštej .
SFX 0419 a ešće .
SFX 0419 a mi .
SFX 0419 a mimoj .
SFX 0419 a mimy .
SFX 0419 a mitaj .
SFX 0419 a mitej .
SFX 0419 a miće .
SFX 0419 a mje .
SFX 0419 a mjemoj .
SFX 0419 a mjemy .
SFX 0419 a mjetaj .
SFX 0419 a mjetej .
SFX 0419 a mjeće .
SFX 0419 a mješ .
SFX 0419 a mu .

SFX 0420 Y 24
SFX 0420 a ach .
SFX 0420 a achmoj .
SFX 0420 a achmy .
SFX 0420 a achu .
SFX 0420 a acy .
SFX 0420 a any .
SFX 0420 a ał .
SFX 0420 a ała .
SFX 0420 a ało .
SFX 0420 a ałoj .
SFX 0420 a eli .
SFX 0420 a enje .
SFX 0420 a eć .
SFX 0420 a eštaj .
SFX 0420 a eštej .
SFX 0420 a ešće .
SFX 0420 a i .
SFX 0420 a imoj .
SFX 0420 a imy .
SFX 0420 a itaj .
SFX 0420 a itej .
SFX 0420 a iće .
SFX 0420 a iš .
SFX 0420 a u .

SFX 0421 Y 30
SFX 0421 ac akli ..
SFX 0421 ac aku ..
SFX 0421 ac akł ..
SFX 0421 ac akła ..
SFX 0421 ac akłe ..
SFX 0421 ac akło ..
SFX 0421 ac akłoj ..
SFX 0421 ac eč ..
SFX 0421 ac ečacy ..
SFX 0421 ac eče ..
SFX 0421 ac ečech ..
SFX 0421 ac ečechmoj ..
SFX 0421 ac ečechmy ..
SFX 0421 ac ečechu ..
SFX 0421 ac ečemoj ..
SFX 0421 ac ečemy ..
SFX 0421 ac ečenje ..
SFX 0421 ac ečeny ..
SFX 0421 ac ečetaj ..
SFX 0421 ac ečetej ..
SFX 0421 ac ečeće ..
SFX 0421 ac ečeš ..
SFX 0421 ac ečeštaj ..
SFX 0421 ac ečeštej ..
SFX 0421 ac ečešće ..
SFX 0421 ac ečmoj ..
SFX 0421 ac ečmy ..
SFX 0421 ac ečtaj ..
SFX 0421 ac ečtej ..
SFX 0421 ac ečće ..

SFX 0422 Y 31
SFX 0422 eć ić ..
SFX 0422 eć owach ..
SFX 0422 eć owachmoj ..
SFX 0422 eć owachmy ..
SFX 0422 eć owachu ..
SFX 0422 eć owacy ..
SFX 0422 eć owali ..
SFX 0422 eć owanje ..
SFX 0422 eć owany ..
SFX 0422 eć ować ..
SFX 0422 eć ował ..
SFX 0422 eć owała ..
SFX 0422 eć owało ..
SFX 0422 eć owałoj ..
SFX 0422 eć owaše ..
SFX 0422 eć owaštaj ..
SFX 0422 eć owaštej ..
SFX 0422 eć owašće ..
SFX 0422 eć uj ..
SFX 0422 eć uja ..
SFX 0422 eć uje ..
SFX 0422 eć ujemoj ..
SFX 0422 eć ujemy ..
SFX 0422 eć ujetaj ..
SFX 0422 eć ujetej ..
SFX 0422 eć ujeće ..
SFX 0422 eć uješ ..
SFX 0422 eć ujtaj ..
SFX 0422 eć ujtej ..
SFX 0422 eć uju ..
SFX 0422 eć ujće ..

SFX 0423 Y 28
SFX 0423 ć sć .
SFX 0423 ć tli .
SFX 0423 ć tu .
SFX 0423 ć tł .
SFX 0423 ć tła .
SFX 0423 ć tłe .
SFX 0423 ć tło .
SFX 0423 ć tłoj .
SFX 0423 ć ćacy .
SFX 0423 ć će .
SFX 0423 ć ćech .
SFX 0423 ć ćechmoj .
SFX 0423 ć ćechmy .
SFX 0423 ć ćechu .
SFX 0423 ć ćemoj .
SFX 0423 ć ćemy .
SFX 0423 ć ćenje .
SFX 0423 ć ćeny .
SFX 0423 ć ćetaj .
SFX 0423 ć ćetej .
SFX 0423 ć ćeće .
SFX 0423 ć ćeš .
SFX 0423 ć ćeštaj .
SFX 0423 ć ćeštej .
SFX 0423 ć ćešće .
SFX 0423 ć ćtaj .
SFX 0423 ć ćtej .
SFX 0423 ć ćće .

SFX 0424 Y 30
SFX 0424 a ach .
SFX 0424 a achmoj .
SFX 0424 a achmy .
SFX 0424 a achu .
SFX 0424 a acy .
SFX 0424 a am .
SFX 0424 a amoj .
SFX 0424 a amy .
SFX 0424 a any .
SFX 0424 a ataj .
SFX 0424 a atej .
SFX 0424 a ał .
SFX 0424 a ała .
SFX 0424 a ało .
SFX 0424 a ałoj .
SFX 0424 a ej .
SFX 0424 a eja .
SFX 0424 a ejtaj .
SFX 0424 a ejtej .
SFX 0424 a ejće .
SFX 0424 a eli .
SFX 0424 a enje .
SFX 0424 a eć .
SFX 0424 a eće .
SFX 0424 a eš .
SFX 0424 a eše .
SFX 0424 a eštaj .
SFX 0424 a eštej .
SFX 0424 a ešće .
SFX 0424 a zyć .

SFX 0425 Y 27
SFX 0425 ć tli .
SFX 0425 ć tu .
SFX 0425 ć tł .
SFX 0425 ć tła .
SFX 0425 ć tłe .
SFX 0425 ć tło .
SFX 0425 ć tłoj .
SFX 0425 ć ćacy .
SFX 0425 ć će .
SFX 0425 ć ćech .
SFX 0425 ć ćechmoj .
SFX 0425 ć ćechmy .
SFX 0425 ć ćechu .
SFX 0425 ć ćemoj .
SFX 0425 ć ćemy .
SFX 0425 ć ćenje .
SFX 0425 ć ćeny .
SFX 0425 ć ćetaj .
SFX 0425 ć ćetej .
SFX 0425 ć ćeće .
SFX 0425 ć ćeš .
SFX 0425 ć ćeštaj .
SFX 0425 ć ćeštej .
SFX 0425 ć ćešće .
SFX 0425 ć ćtaj .
SFX 0425 ć ćtej .
SFX 0425 ć ćće .

SFX 0426 Y 31
SFX 0426 ła ćel ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelacy ..
SFX 0426 ła ćele ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelemoj ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelemy ..
SFX 0426 ła ćeletaj ..
SFX 0426 ła ćeletej ..
SFX 0426 ła ćeleće ..
SFX 0426 ła ćeleš ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelmoj ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelmy ..
SFX 0426 ła ćeltaj ..
SFX 0426 ła ćeltej ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelu ..
SFX 0426 ła ćelće ..
SFX 0426 ła łach ..
SFX 0426 ła łachmoj ..
SFX 0426 ła łachmy ..
SFX 0426 ła łachu ..
SFX 0426 ła łali ..
SFX 0426 ła łanje ..
SFX 0426 ła łany ..
SFX 0426 ła łać ..
SFX 0426 ła łał ..
SFX 0426 ła łała ..
SFX 0426 ła łałe ..
SFX 0426 ła łało ..
SFX 0426 ła łałoj ..
SFX 0426 ła łaštaj ..
SFX 0426 ła łaštej ..
SFX 0426 ła łašće ..

SFX 0427 Y 31
SFX 0427 er erjacy ..
SFX 0427 er erje ..
SFX 0427 er erjemoj ..
SFX 0427 er erjemy ..
SFX 0427 er erjetaj ..
SFX 0427 er erjetej ..
SFX 0427 er erjeće ..
SFX 0427 er erješ ..
SFX 0427 er ermoj ..
SFX 0427 er ermy ..
SFX 0427 er ertaj ..
SFX 0427 er ertej ..
SFX 0427 er eru ..
SFX 0427 er erće ..
SFX 0427 er ra ..
SFX 0427 er rach ..
SFX 0427 er rachmoj ..
SFX 0427 er rachmy ..
SFX 0427 er rachu ..
SFX 0427 er rali ..
SFX 0427 er ranje ..
SFX 0427 er rany ..
SFX 0427 er rać ..
SFX 0427 er rał ..
SFX 0427 er rała ..
SFX 0427 er rałe ..
SFX 0427 er rało ..
SFX 0427 er rałoj ..
SFX 0427 er raštaj ..
SFX 0427 er raštej ..
SFX 0427 er rašće ..

SFX 0428 Y 28
SFX 0428 a achmoj .
SFX 0428 a achmy .
SFX 0428 a achu .
SFX 0428 a acy .
SFX 0428 a amoj .
SFX 0428 a amy .
SFX 0428 a any .
SFX 0428 a ataj .
SFX 0428 a atej .
SFX 0428 a ał .
SFX 0428 a ała .
SFX 0428 a ało .
SFX 0428 a ałoj .
SFX 0428 a e .
SFX 0428 a ech .
SFX 0428 a ej .
SFX 0428 a eja .
SFX 0428 a ejtaj .
SFX 0428 a ejtej .
SFX 0428 a ejće .
SFX 0428 a eli .
SFX 0428 a enje .
SFX 0428 a eć .
SFX 0428 a eće .
SFX 0428 a eštaj .
SFX 0428 a eštej .
SFX 0428 a ešće .
SFX 0428 a u .

SFX 0429 Y 13
SFX 0429 0 a .
SFX 0429 0 e .
SFX 0429 0 eho .
SFX 0429 0 ej .
SFX 0429 0 eje .
SFX 0429 0 eju .
SFX 0429 0 emu .
SFX 0429 0 i .
SFX 0429 0 ich .
SFX 0429 0 im .
SFX 0429 0 imaj .
SFX 0429 0 imi .
SFX 0429 0 u .

SFX 0430 Y 7
SFX 0430 su jes ..
SFX 0430 su sach ..
SFX 0430 su sam ..
SFX 0430 su sami ..
SFX 0430 su somaj ..
SFX 0430 su sow ..
SFX 0430 su sy ..

SFX 0431 Y 3
SFX 0431 kim chtó ...
SFX 0431 kim koho ...
SFX 0431 kim komu ...

SFX 0432 Y 3
SFX 0432 kimžkuli chtóžkuli ........
SFX 0432 kimžkuli kohožkuli ........
SFX 0432 kimžkuli komužkuli ........

SFX 0433 Y 3
SFX 0433 kimžkuliž chtóžkuliž .........
SFX 0433 kimžkuliž kohožkuliž .........
SFX 0433 kimžkuliž komužkuliž .........

SFX 0434 Y 3
SFX 0434 čim čeho ...
SFX 0434 čim čemu ...
SFX 0434 čim što ...

SFX 0435 Y 3
SFX 0435 čimžkuli čehožkuli ........
SFX 0435 čimžkuli čemužkuli ........
SFX 0435 čimžkuli štožkuli ........

SFX 0436 Y 3
SFX 0436 čimžkuliž čehožkuliž .........
SFX 0436 čimžkuliž čemužkuliž .........
SFX 0436 čimžkuliž štožkuliž .........

SFX 0437 Y 3
SFX 0437 o eho .
SFX 0437 o emu .
SFX 0437 o im .

SFX 0438 Y 12
SFX 0438 0 ach .
SFX 0438 0 aj .
SFX 0438 0 am .
SFX 0438 0 ami .
SFX 0438 0 ej .
SFX 0438 0 i .
SFX 0438 0 ija .
SFX 0438 0 o .
SFX 0438 0 om .
SFX 0438 0 omaj .
SFX 0438 0 ow .
SFX 0438 0 u .

SFX 0439 Y 4
SFX 0439 0 a .
SFX 0439 0 ach .
SFX 0439 0 am .
SFX 0439 0 ami .
