SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
naja/0419
nalac/0421
naměrjeć/0422
napleć/0423
naraža/0424
narosć/0425
naser/0427
nasměrjeć/0422
naswarja/0428
nasła/0426
nawsu/0430
nałža/0420
naš/0429
nažer/0427
nik/0438
nikim/0431
ničo/0437
njebjes/0439
njenaja/0419
njenalac/0421
njenapleć/0423
njenarosć/0425
njenaser/0427
njenasła/0426
njenałža/0420
njenažer/0427
njeporosć/0425
njeposła/0426
njepósła/0426
njepřeja/0419
njepřenaja/0419
njepřerosć/0425
njepřežer/0427
njepřija/0419
njepřipósła/0426
njepřirosć/0425
njerozesła/0426
njerozmjeć/0423
njerozpleć/0423
njerozrosć/0425
njerozžer/0427
njespleć/0423
njewobrosć/0425
njewobłža/0420
njewopřija/0419
njewotesła/0426
njewotpósła/0426
njewotrosć/0425
njewumjeć/0423
njewupósła/0426
njewurosć/0425
njewuser/0427
njewusła/0426
njewułža/0420
njewušča/0420
njewužer/0427
njezaja/0419
njezapleć/0423
njezapřija/0419
njezarosć/0425
njezarža/0420
njezasła/0426
njezažer/0427
njezeja/0419
njezełža/0420
njezežer/0427
njezmjeć/0423
njezrosć/0425
někim/0431
někimžkuli/0432
někimžkuliž/0433
něčim/0434
něčimžkuli/0435
něčimžkuliž/0436
podróšeć/0422
porosć/0425
posła/0426
pozhubjeć/0422
pósła/0426
přeja/0419
přeličeć/0422
přenaja/0419
přerosć/0425
přežer/0427
přija/0419
přikłonjeć/0422
připósła/0426
přirosć/0425
přiwaleć/0422
přiwarjeć/0422
rozesła/0426
rozkoćeć/0422
rozmjeć/0423
rozpleć/0423
rozrosć/0425
rozžehleć/0422
rozžer/0427
spleć/0423
waš/0429
wobrosć/0425
wobłža/0420
wopřija/0419
wotesła/0426
wotpósła/0426
wotrosć/0425
woćeńšeć/0422
woćěmnjeć/0422
wočornjeć/0422
wsu/0430
wukuleć/0422
wumjeć/0423
wupósła/0426
wurosć/0425
wuser/0427
wustróžeć/0422
wusła/0426
wuwaleć/0422
wułža/0420
wušča/0420
wužer/0427
zadanjeć/0422
zaja/0419
zakorjenjeć/0422
zaličeć/0422
zanurjeć/0422
zapleć/0423
zapřija/0419
zarosć/0425
zarža/0420
zasła/0426
zawažeć/0422
zažer/0427
zbudźeć/0422
zeja/0419
zełža/0420
zežer/0427
zmjeć/0423
zmócnjeć/0422
zrosć/0425
